Maryland, session 2026, HB1587.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Criminal Law
12–301.
In this subtitle:
(1) “slot machine” means a machine, apparatus, or device that:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1587*

HOUSE BILL 1587
(i) operates or can be made to operate by inserting, depositing, or
placing with another person money, a token, or another object; and
(ii) through the element of chance, the reading of a game of chance,
the delivery of a game of chance, or any other outcome unpredictable by the user, awards
the user:
1. money, a token, or other object that represents or that can
be converted into money; or
2. the right to receive money, a token, or another object that
represents and can be converted into money;
(2) “slot machine” includes:
(i) a machine, apparatus, or device described in item (1) of this
section that also sells, delivers, or awards merchandise, money, or some other tangible
thing of value;
(ii) a pinball machine or console machine that pays off in
merchandise; and
(iii) a machine, apparatus, or device described in item (1) of this
section, regardless of whether the machine, apparatus, or device delivers a game through
the Internet or offers Internet or other services; and
(3) “slot machine” does not include a machine, apparatus, or device that:
(i) awards the user only free additional games or plays;
(ii) awards the user only noncash merchandise or noncash prizes of
minimal value;
(iii) dispenses paper pull tab tip jar tickets or paper pull tab instant
bingo tickets that must be opened manually by the user provided that the machine,
apparatus, or device does not:
1. read the tickets electronically;
2. alert the user to a winning or losing ticket; or
3. tabulate a player’s winnings and losses;
(iv) 1. is a handheld device that displays only facsimiles of bingo
cards that an individual uses to mark and monitor contemporaneously to a live call of bingo
numbers called on the premises by an individual where the user is operating the machine;

HOUSE BILL 1587 3
2. [does not permit a user to play more than 54 bingo cards
at the same time;
3.] does not randomly generate any numbers; and
[4.] 3. is not part of an integrated system;
(v) is used by the State Lottery and Gaming Control Commission
under Title 9 of the State Government Article;
(vi) if legislation takes effect authorizing the operation of video
lottery terminals, is a video lottery terminal as defined in and licensed under that
legislation;
(vii) is a skills–based amusement device that awards prizes,
merchandise, tickets, tokens, or other objects that:
1. per play, do not exceed minimal value approved by the
State Lottery and Gaming Control Commission through regulation; and
2. may be accumulated and exchanged for noncash
merchandise or prizes of value that:
A. is similar to the cumulated value of the objects exchanged;
and
B. does not exceed a minimal wholesale value of $599; or
(viii) is a skills–based device that awards noncash merchandise and is
located at a family entertainment center in Worcester County licensed under § 9–1B–02 of
the State Government Article.
12–301.1.
(e) (1) THIS SUBSECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO AN ELECTRONIC INSTANT
BINGO MACHINE AUTHORIZED UNDER § 12–308 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(2) An electronic gaming device that is not licensed or otherwise operated
in compliance with the provisions of this section as of January 1, 2013, is an illegal gaming
device that may not legally operate in the State.
12–308.
(A) Notwithstanding any other provisions of this subtitle, an entity licensed to
offer instant bingo under a commercial bingo license on July 1, 2007, or by a qualified
organization as defined in § 13–201 of this article on the premises of the qualified

HOUSE BILL 1587
organization may continue to operate a game of instant bingo in the same manner using
electronic machines, provided that:
(1) [(i) the machines were in operation for a 1–year period ending
December 31, 2007; or
(ii) the machines were in operation under a commercial bingo license
on December 31, 2007;
(2)] the entity does not operate more than TWICE the number of electronic
machines in operation on February 28, 2008; and
[(3)] (2) the conduct of the gaming and operation of the machines are
consistent with all other provisions of this article.
(B) AN ELECTRONIC MACHINE ALLOWED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS
SECTION IS NOT REQUIRED TO PRINT A PAPER TICKET FOR EACH GAME OF INSTANT
BINGO PLAYED UNLESS THE PLAYER ELECTS TO PRINT THE TICKET.
(C) THE STATE LOTTERY AND GAMING CONTROL COMMISSION SHALL
ADOPT REGULATIONS TO IMPLEMENT THIS SECTION.
Chapter 603 of the Acts of 2012
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, a licensee or organization
that is authorized under State law to own or operate electronic bingo machines for use after
July 1, 2012, may repair and replace the authorized electronic bingo machines provided
that the machines operate in the same manner as those in operation by the same
organization as of February 28, 2008[, and that the organization does not operate more
than the number of electronic bingo machines in operation as of February 28, 2008].
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.